Utah statutes.
20A-3-401.   Intent and purpose of part.
(1)  Each election officer, election official, and judge shall liberally
interpret and apply this part to:
(a)  make it possible for Utah voters living or serving abroad to vote in
county, state, and national elections during their absence;
(b)  enable these voters to register more conveniently;
(c)  conform to 42 U.S.C. 1973ff, Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act; and
(d)  in accordance with Public Law 107-252, the Help America Vote Act of 2002,
exempt overseas and military voters from the identification requirements of
Section 20A-3-308.
(2)  The state selective service, all military organizations, and citizens and
officers of Utah or of the respective counties and municipalities of the state
shall cooperate with the election and party officers in carrying out the
intent and purpose of this part.
(3)  All state and county officers of Utah shall:
(a)  do all things and perform all acts necessary to put into effect the
provisions of any Act of Congress or this state allowing uniformed and
overseas citizen voters to vote; and
(b)  permit the use of any official ballot authorized by any Act of Congress
and this part as a ballot supplementary to the official Utah election military
ballot.
(4)  Each provision of this part prevails over any inconsistent provision of
any other statute or any part of any statute.
